Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.020

Terms defined.

Definition of terms:

(1) "Appointing power" means the county sheriff who is invested by law with power and authority to select, appoint, or employ any deputy, deputies, or other necessary employees subject to civil service;

(2) "Appointment" includes all means of selecting, appointing, or employing any person to any office, place, position, or employment subject to civil service;

(3) "Commission" means the civil service commission, or combined county civil service commission, herein created, and "commissioner" means any one of the members of any such commission;

(4) "County" means any county of the state, or any counties combined pursuant to RCW 41.14.040 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

(5) "Deputy sheriff or other members of the office of county sheriff" means all persons regularly employed in the office of county sheriff either on a part time or full time basis.

[ 2009 c 112 s 1; 1959 c 1 s 2 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).